en: pot, cup, pots, cups
bg: кофичка
de: Becher
es: Bote, botes, vaso, vasos
fr: Pot, pots, coupelle, coupelles, verrine, verrines, ravier, raviers, coupe, coupes, coupe / coupelle
hu: Pohár, fazék, lábas, edény, csésze, kanna
nl: Kuip, kuipje
pl: Kubek, Kubeczek
pt: Pote, potes, boião, boiões, copo

en: individual pot, individual cup, individual pots, individual cups
de: Portionsbecher
fr: pot individuel, pots individuels
hu: külön edény, külön fazék
nl: Individuele pot, individuele potten
pt: Pote individual, potes individuais, boião individual, boiões individuais

en: Tumbler
de: Trinkbecher, Pappbecher, Einwegbecher
fr: Gobelet
nl: Beker, Bekers, Koffiebeker, Cup

en: Tube, tubes
de: Tube, Tuben
fr: Tube, tubes
hu: Tubus, tubusok, Cső, csövek, cső alakú
it: Tubo, tubi
nl: Tube, Tubes
pt: Bisnaga, bisnagas, tubo de bisnaga, tubos de bisnagas

en: Fastener, clip
bg: Клипса
de: Clip
fr: Attache
hu: Rögzítő, kapocs, csipesz
it: laccetto, laccio
nl: clip, klemmetje
pt: Atilho, atilhos, presilha, presilhas, fita, fitas, cordão, cordões, atadura, ataduras, fecho, fechos, fexo, feixo, fexos, feixos, fio, fios

en: bread clip, bag clip, occlupanid
de: Beutelclip, Verschlussclip

en: staple, staples
ar: دبوس مزدوج السن
ca: grapa
ce: атлан
cs: spony do sešívaček
cv: такар
cy: stwffwl
da: hæfteklamme
de: Heftklammer
eo: krampo
es: grapa
et: aas
eu: grapa
fa: سوزن منگنه
fi: niitti
fr: agrafe
gl: grampa
hu: tűzőkapocs
id: Kokot
it: agrafes, graffette
ja: ホッチキス針, ステープル
ko: 스테이플
la: Uncinulus
ms: dawai kokot
nb: heftestift
nl: nietje
pl: zszywka, zszywki
pt: agrafos, grampo
ro: scoabă
ru: скобы для степлеров, скоба
sl: sponka
su: eusi hékter
sv: häftklammer, häftklamrar
tr: zımba telleri, zımba
uk: скоба
vi: đinh kẹp
yi: דרעטל
zh: 订书钉, 鋦釘, 訂書釘

en: Tie, knot
fr: Lien, noeud, Liens, noeuds, Liens ( collier - ficelle - ruban - ruban adhésif - bolduc - feuillard - bande - cordon - fil - elastique - bracelet…)
it: nodo, fiocco
nl: Knoop, strik

en: bag, bags
ar: حقيبة
az: kisə
bg: торбичка, торбички, чанта
bn: থলে
br: sac'h
ca: bossa
cs: pytel
cv: михĕ
cy: bag
da: pose, poser, taske, tasker
de: Tüte, Sack, Beutel
el: σακούλα, τσάντα
eo: sako, sakoj
es: bolsa, bolsas
et: kott
eu: zaku
fa: کیسه
fi: laukku
fr: sachet, sac, sachets, sacs, berlingots, berlingot, poche, poches, pochon, pochons, flowpack, Poche / Pochette / Pochon, Sac / Sachet / Flowpack
ga: mála
gl: bolsa
gn: vosa
ha: jaka
hi: थैला
ht: sak
hu: zacskó, zacskók, tasak, tasakos, szatyor
hy: պայուսակ
id: tas
ig: àkpà
ik: miitchuk
is: poki
it: sacco, sacchetto, sacchettino
ja: 袋
jv: tas
kk: дорба
kn: ಚೀಲ
ko: 가방
la: saccus
ln: libenga
lt: rankinė
lv: soma
mk: торба
ml: സഞ്ചി
ms: beg
nb: pose
ne: झोला
nl: zak, sachet, tas, verzendzak, zakken, zakje, zakjes
nn: veske
or: ବ୍ୟାଗ
pl: torba
pt: saco, sacos, saquinho, saquinhos, saqueta, saquetas, sacola
qu: wayaqa
ro: sac
ru: сумка
sd: ٿيلھو
se: lávka
sk: taška
sl: vreča
sn: bhegi
so: bac
sq: çantë
sr: кеса
ss: sikhwama
su: kantong
sv: påse, påsar, väska, väskor
sw: begi
te: సంచి
th: ถุง
tr: çanta
ts: nkwama
tt: букча
uk: мішок
uz: sumka
vi: túi
yi: זעקל
za: daeh
zh: 袋

en: Handle, handles
bg: Дръжка, дръжки
de: Griff, Griffe, Handgriff, Handgriffe
es: Asa, Asas, Manija, Manijas
fr: Poignée, poignées
it: maniglia, maniglie
nl: Handvat, handvaten
pt: Alça, alças, pega, pegas, manípulo, manípulos

en: Carrying bag, carrying bags
de: Tragetasche
fr: Sac de transport, sacs de transport
nl: Draagtas, draagzak, draagzakken, draagtassen

en: Crate, crates, punnet
de: Steige, Obstkiste, Flaschenkasten, Getränkekasten
fr: Cagette, cagettes, cageot, cageots, Cageot / Cagette / Caisse / Caissette
hu: Láda, lécláda, ketrec
nl: Krat, kratten
pt: Caixote, caixotes

en: Individual bag, individual bags
bg: Индивидуална торбичка, индивидуални торбички
de: Einzeltüten, einzelne Tüten
fr: Sachet individuel, Sachets individuels
hu: Külön zacskó, egyenkénti zacskó, külön tasak, egyenként zacskózott
nl: Individuele zak, individuele zakken
pt: Saco individual, sacos individuais, saquinho individual, saquinhos individuais, saqueta individual, saquetas individuais

en: Pouch flask, doypack, pouch
de: Standbeutel, Standbodenbeutel, Doypack, Quetschbeutel
fr: Gourde, gourde individuelle, gourdes individuelles, doypack, pouch, Gourde / Doypack
hu: Flakon, Kulacs, flaska
it: Borraccia
pt: Frasco, frascos

en: Sleeve, sleeves, sheath, outer open-end box
de: Manschette, Banderole
fr: Étui, étuis, Fourreau, fourreaux
hu: haskötő
nl: Banderol, huls
pt: Manga, mangas

en: Mold
fr: Moule
nl: Mossel

en: Tethered cap, attached cap, tethered caps, attached caps
bg: Прикрепена капачка
de: Tethered Cap, anhängender Verschluss, fest verbundener Deckel
fr: Bouchon solidaire, bouchons solidaires, bouchon attaché, bouchons attachés

en: Lid or cap, cap or lid
fr: Bouchon ou couvercle, Couvercle ou bouchon, Bouchon (non solidaire) / Capsule / Couvercle
it: Coperchio o tappo, tappo o coperchio
sv: lock\, kapsyl eller kork

en: overcap, over cap, over capsule
fr: coiffe, coiffes

en: Lid, cover, lids, covers
da: Låg
de: Deckel
el: Καπάκι
fr: Couvercle, couvercles
hu: Fedél, tető, fedő
it: coperchio
nb: Lokk
nl: Deksel, deksels
pl: Nakrętka, Zakrętka, Pokrywka, Wieczko, Wieko
pt: Tampa, tampas
ro: capac
sv: lock, locket